Utah statutes.
13-1-6.   Rules and regulations.

(1)  The executive director shall prescribe rules and procedures for the management and operation of the department, the conduct of its employees, and the custody, use, and preservation of its records, papers, books, documents, and property.

(2)  The department and its divisions, in contemplation, formulation, and passage of rules pursuant to Subsection (1), shall acknowledge and consider the facilitation of commerce in all its forms, including reliable electronic commerce, for the benefit of both consumers and businesses.



Amended by Chapter 86, 2000 General Session

